en: Sporting Goods > Fitness & General Exercise Equipment > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates Machines: Pilates Barrels; Pilates Cadillacs; Pilates Chairs; Pilates Reformers; Pilates Towers
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 健身及一般運動器材 > 瑜珈和皮拉提斯 > 皮拉提斯機: 皮拉提斯梯桶; 皮拉提斯凱迪拉克床; 皮拉提斯椅; 皮拉提斯塑身機; 皮拉提斯塔
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Equipamentos para fitness e exercícios gerais > Ioga e pilates > Máquinas de pilates: Barris de Pilates; Cadillacs de Pilates; Cadeiras de pilates; Máquinas Reformer de pilates; Torres de pilates
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Echipamente pentru fitness și exerciții fizice > Yoga și Pilates > Aparate pentru Pilates: Butoaie de pilates; Aparate Cadillac pentru pilates; Scaune pentru Pilates; Aparate reformer pentru Pilates; Turnuri pentru Pilates
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sprzęt fitness i ogólny do ćwiczeń > Joga i pilates > Sprzęt do pilatesu: Beczki do pilatesu; Cadillaki do pilatesu; Krzesła do pilatesu; Reformery do pilatesu; Poręcze do pilatesu
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Оборудване за фитнес и общи упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Машини за пилатес: Пилатес барели; Трапец за пилатес; Пилатес столове; Уреди за пилатес Реформър; Уреди за пилатес тип успоредка
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Fitneso ir bendrojo pobūdžio treniruočių įranga > Joga ir pilatesas > Pilateso treniruokliai: Pilateso statinės; Pilateso „Cadillac“ treniruokliai; Pilateso kėdės; Pilateso treniruokliai „Reformer“; Pilateso stovai
it: Articoli sportivi > Attrezzature per fitness e esercizi generali > Yoga e pilates > Macchine pilates: Barrel per pilates; Cadillac per pilates; Sedie pilates; Riformatori pilates; Torri pilates
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Vybavení pro fitness a běžné cvičení > Jóga a pilates > Trenažéry na pilates: Pilates barely; Stroje pilates cadillac; Pilates židle; Zařízení Pilates Reformer; Pilates věže
de: Sportartikel > Fitness- & allgemeine Trainingsgeräte > Yoga & Pilates > Pilates-Geräte: Pilates-Barrels; Pilates-Cadillacs; Pilates-Stühle; Pilates-Reformer; Pilates-Türme
hu: Sportszerek > Fitnesz és általános edzőfelszerelés > Jóga és pilátesz > Piláteszgépek: Pilates hordók; Pilates Cadillac gépek; Piláteszszékek; Piláteszreformátorok; Pilátesztornyok
ru: Спортивные товары > Фитнес и физические упражнения > Йога и пилатес > Тренажеры для пилатеса: Бочки для пилатеса; Тренажеры Кадиллак для пилатеса; Стулья для пилатеса; Реформеры; Столы-трапеции
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Equipamentos de fitness e exercícios gerais > Yoga e Pilates > Aparelhos para pilates: Barris de pilates; Cadillacs de pilates; Cadeiras de pilates; Reformadores para pilates; Torres para pilates
nl: Sportartikelen > Fitness- en algemene trainingsapparaten > Yoga en pilates > Pilatesapparaten: Pilatesbarrels; Pilates cadillacs; Pilatesstoelen; Pilatesreformers; Pilatestorens
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 健身与一般运动器材 > 瑜伽与普拉提 > 普拉提健身器: 普拉提梯桶; 普拉提秋千床; 普拉提椅; 普拉提塑身机; 普拉提滑轮塔
sv: Sportartiklar > Fitness- och allmän träningsutrustning > Yoga och pilates > Pilatesmaskiner: Pilates barrels; Pilates cadillacs; Pilatesstolar; Pilatesreformatorer; Pilatestorn
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Oprema za fitnes in splošno vadbo > Joga in pilates > Naprave za pilates: Sodi za pilates; Pilates Cadillac; Stoli za pilates; Pilates reformerji; Stolpi za pilates
fr: Équipements sportifs > Équipement de fitness et d’exercice général > Pilates et yoga > Machines pilates: Barils de Pilates; Cadillacs de Pilates; Chaises Pilates; Pilates Reformer; Tours de Pilates
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Kuntoilu- ja yleiskuntolaitteet > Jooga ja pilates > Pilateslaitteet: Pilates-tynnyrit; Pilates cadillac -laitteet; Pilatestuolit; Pilates reformer -laitteet; Pilatestelineet
da: Sportsartikler > Fitness og almindeligt træningsudstyr > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner: Pilates-barrels; Pilates-cadillacs; Pilatesstole; Pilates-reformatorer; Pilates-tårne
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Εξοπλισμός για γενική άσκηση & φυσική κατάσταση > Γιόγκα & Pilates > Μηχανήματα Pilates: Βαρέλια πιλάτες; Cadillac πιλάτες; Καρέκλες Pilates; Pilates Reformers; Πύργοι Pilates
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Oprema za fitness i tjelovježbu > Joga i pilates > Sprave za pilates: Bačve za pilates; Pilates Cadillac; Stolice za pilates; Reformeri za pilates; Tornjevi za pilates
ja: スポーツ用品 > フィットネス・一般的な運動器具 > ヨガ・ピラティス > ピラティスマシン: ピラティスバレル; ピラティスキャデラック; ピラティスチェア; ピラティスリフォーマー; ピラティスタワー
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Fitness ve Genel Egzersiz Ekipmanları > Yoga ve Pilates > Pilates Makineleri: Pilates barrel'ları; Pilates cadillac'ları; Pilates Sandalyeleri; Pilates Reformerları; Pilates Kuleleri
ko: 스포츠용품 > 피트니스/일반 운동 장비 > 요가/필라테스 > 필라테스 기구: 필라테스 바렐; 필라테스 캐딜락; 필라테스 의자; 필라테스 리포머; 필라테스 타워
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Vybavenie na fitness a cvičenie > Joga a pilates > Vybavenie na pilates: Pilatesové sudy; Pilatesové konštrukcie; Stoličky na pilates; Reforméri na pilates; Veže na pilates
nb: Sportsutstyr > Utstyr for fitness- og generell trening > Yoga og pilates > Pilatesmaskiner: Pilates barrels; Pilates cadillacs; Pilatesstoler; Pilatesreformatorer; Pilatestårn
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Thiết bị tập thể thao & thể dục tổng hợp > Yoga và Pilate > Máy tập thể dục: Trống tập Pilates; Khung tập Pilates Cadillac; Ghế Pilate; Máy reformer Pilate; Tháp tập Pilate
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipos de fitness y ejercicio general > Yoga y pilates > Máquinas de pilates: Barriles de pilates; Cadillacs de pilates; Sillas de pilates; Reformadores de pilates; Torres de pilates
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > อุปกรณ์ออกกำลังกายทั่วไปและฟิตเนส > โยคะและพิลาทีส > เครื่องพิลาทีส: บาร์เรลพิลาทิส; คาดิลแลคพิลาทิส; เก้าอี้พิลาทีส; เก้าอี้พิลาทีส รีฟอร์เมอร์; เสาพิลาทีส